Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1689XC (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 232.46, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (5) Placement of the child in a group or family foster care 3 setting or a supervised apartment living arrangement , if the 4 court makes a determination that such a placement is the least 5 restrictive option. 6 Sec. 2. Section 234.35, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0e. When a court has entered an order 9 transferring the legal custody of the child to a supervised 10 apartment living arrangement pursuant to section 232.46, 11 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5). However, 12 payment shall not be made for a supervised apartment living 13 arrangement unless the supervised apartment living arrangement 14 meets requirements as established by the department by rule. 15